Nevada, session 83, AB166.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 609.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
609.240 1. No child under the age of [16] 18 years may be
employed, permitted or suffered to work at any gainful occupation,
other than employment as a performer in the production of a motion
picture or work on a farm [, more] :
(a) More than [48] 40 hours in any 1 week [, or more] ;
(b) More than 8 hours in any 1 day [.] ; and
(c) If the child is a pupil, before 5 a.m. on any day in which the
school at which the pupil is enrolled is in session and after 10 p.m.
on any day immediately preceding such a day.
2. The presence of a child in any establishment during working
hours is prima facie evidence of employment of the child therein.
3. As used in this section, “pupil” means a child enrolled for
the current academic year in a public school, as defined in NRS
385.007, or a private school, as defined in NRS 394.103.
H
-
*AB166*